dictsource/da_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Danish


// Peter Bjarkov pbj1234@hotmail.com

// Most of the rules are commented with at least one word
// which shuld use that particular rule.
// If this is not the case, the whole word is part of the rule
// or the rule is before my (PB's) time.

// Phonemes - vowels: i e E y Y & &# @ @- a 3 W W# V A 0 (zero) o O u

.replace
ü	y
ö ø
ä æ
// velars - testing "j"
.L01  k g ck nk ng q j
// labialer
.L02 p b f v m
// fortungekonsonanter experimental
.L03 l d
// fortungevokaler - front vowels
.L04 u y i ø o
// bagtungevokaler - not finished, not used yet
.L05 a æ å
// pande, bande - pege, bege - passe, basse
.L06 p b
.L07 t k v // time, kime - tone, kone - tage, bage - tanke, banke TESTING "v"
.L08 sp st sk
.L09 m n // ens før vokal: naller, maller - ikke efter: nam, nan
.L10 c k
.L11 a e

.group a

        a          ?&        // Defalut short a
     _) at (_      &
     h) al (fback  A
        aaron      ArVn      // name
    sw) anage      _^_en
   zol) a          '&        // name
     m) ary        &ri       // name
    _t) ate        Ejt       // name
     b) ates (_    Ejts      // name
shangh) ai         Aj
    bl) a (zer     E
   vin) ai (gre    'E        // stressed
 _gymn) a (st      '&        // stressed
 _gymn) a (sti     &         // avoid secondary stress in gymnastik
 stigm) a (ta      '&        // stressed
   arm) ad (a      '&:d      // stressed
 _priv) a (t       '?&       // stressed
  _pen) a (lhus    '?&       // stressed
    di) abetes     ?&b'et@-s
        avondale   _^_en
     l) ay (out    ?Ej

// Long a
        a (Ce      &         // ane
   L08) a (C       ?&        // staten
    bl) anche      AntS      // name & in stead of A?
    sp) a (de      &
  _imp) a (la      '&:       // stressed
    sh) a (ver     ?Ej

// Short vowel before double consonant
     r) a (C%++    ?A        // trappe
        a (C%+     ?&        // pladder, basser, masser
        a (dt+     ?&        // uskadte - dt => d
        a (ld+     ?&        // kalde, falde - ld => l double consonant
     C) a (L06%    ?A        // tapper, tappen, lapper, lappen
     v) a (cc      ?A        // vaccinere
        a (ffald+  A
     s) a (bbat    ?&
  grim) a (sse     '?&       // stressed
  _sav) a (nne     '?&       // stressed
    _c) annes      &:n:      // French city
        a (cc+     ?A        // accent
     b) accarat    ?Ak?Ar'?A
    st) a (ccato   &

// Short followed by 2 consonants = 1 phoneme: lg=>[l], ds=>[s]
        a (lg      ?&        // valg, valget, alge - TEST
        a (ls      ?&        // hals, halsen
        a (ds      ?&        // plads
        a (nd+     ?&        // manden, handel
     d) an (dy     &:n       // dandy
    br) an (dy     &:n       // brandy

// short & - more specific rule(s) needed
    pl) a (n       ?&        // plan
    pl) a (ner     ?&        // planer
    pl) a (nen     ?&        // planen
   bef) a (l       ?&        // befale
     h) a (vet     ?&        // havet "the sea"

// long & before de(n) - made long in ph_danish
        a (de+     &         // gade, skade
        a (den     &         //gaden

// combinations with "lade = l&
    _l) ade (_være_ &
    _l) ader (_være_ A
    _l) ade (_dig_ &
    _l) ade (_sig_ &

// General rule, most words with af- plus vowel: [f] => [w]
        af (A      ?Aw       // afart, afprøve

// exceptions to the 'a)f(A' rule below
     c) afe        ?&f'?e    // cafe, bogcafe
     c) afé        ?&f'?e    // café
        af (asi    ?&f       // afasi
        af (atisk  ?&f       // afatisk
        af (or     ?&f       // aforisme, aforistisk
        af (olk    ?&f       // mafiafolk
  dikt) afon       ?&f'?on

// Have = "oceans" vs. the verb "have" pronounced h?&
 _vi_h) ave (_     ?&        // hvad skal vi have?
 _du_h) ave (_     ?&        // hvad skal du have?
 _de_h) ave (_     ?&        // hvad skal de have?
_vil_i_h) ave (_   ?&        // hvad vil I have? NOT "i have og floder"
_jeg_h) ave (_     ?&        // hvad skal jeg have?
_vil_h) ave (_     ?&
_han_h) ave (_     ?&
_hun_h) ave (_     ?&
 _må_h) ave (_     ?&
_kunne_h) ave (_   ?&        // kunne have sagt
_kan_h) ave (_     ?&        // kunne have sagt
_burde_h) ave (_   ?&        // burde have sagt
_også_h) ave (_    ?&
_nok_h) ave (_     ?&
_nødig_h) ave (_   ?&
_bare_h) ave (_    ?&
_kun_h) ave (_     ?&
_ikke_h) ave (_    ?&
_stadig_h) ave (_  ?&
 _jo_h) ave (_     ?&
_straks_h) ave (_  ?&
_altid_h) ave (_   ?&
_godt_h) ave (_    ?&
_bør_h) ave (_     ?&
    _h) ave (_et_  ?&
    _h) ave (_en_  ?&
    _h) ave (_tænkt_ ?&
    _h) ave (_godt_ ?&
    _h) ave (_den_ ?&
    _h) ave (_det_ ?&
    _h) ave (_dem_ ?&

     t) abernak    abVn'ak   // tabernakel, tabernakler
   mil) a (no      '&:       // stressed
     n) a (bo      &:        //

  past) a          &         // tandpastareklame

     r) a (CK+     ?A        // drab, Rasmus, rask
     r) a (CA+     A         // drabelig, brase, gratis
     @) a (be+     ?&        // sweateraber
     r) a (Ci+     ?A        // tradition, radio
     r) a (len+    ?A        // gralen TEST
 teatr) a (l       '?A       // teatralsk
     r) a (le+     A         // morale, prale
     r) a (dio++   A         // shortend too much by ph_danish
    br) ady        Ejdi      // name
    br) adbury     &db@-re   // name
        a (dress++ &         // afsenderadresse
  _der) af (_      ,&        //
        a (nstreng++ &       // overanstrengelse
        a (ntal+   &         // meterantal
        a (ttach+  &         // militærattache
  hvor) af         =,&       //
        a (nlæg+   &         // militæranlæg
  oreg) a (no      '&:       // stressed
  laud) a (num     '&        // stressed
     w) a (ter     O         //
     w) ade        Ejd       // Wade, waders
        arapahoe   &r'&p&hOw //

//  PB final -graf in da_list - stressed a, stressed i when i is added
   &gr) af ($p_alt '?Af      // biograf
   &gr) af (i$p_alt ?Af'     // biografi

// amm => [A]
        a (mm++    ?A        // kammerat, amme

// k/c + ame => [&]
   L10) a (me+     &         // kamel, kamera, Camelot

     s) a (me+     &         // person from Lapland
     s) a (mer+    ?&        // plur.

        au (_revoir %o       // au revoir
        au (_pair  %o        // au pair-pige
        a (lt      ?&        // alt, overalt, altid - short
     w) a (lt      O         // name
    vr) a (lt      A         // vralte
        aserbajdsjan &sVb&S'&n //
  opst) a (ndelse  '&        // stressed

// general rule: [A] after r
     r) a (_       A         // jura, zebra
    tr) a          A         // kontraordre
    tr) ai (ler    Ej        // trailer
     r) aer (_     AV        // fakturaer, zebraer
    fr) a          A         // bagfra
    fr) aiche      'ES       // cremefraiche
  laur) a          A         // name
     r) a (en      A         // rivieraen
    Cr) a (n       A         // transport
    br) a (C       A         // Abraham
   _br) ando       &ndOw     // Marlon Brando
     r) a (n       A         // ran, ransage
    _r) anda (l    &ndO      // Randall - name
    tr) a (L02     ?A        // straf, traf, trav
     r) a (nd+     ?A        // strand - short A
    br) a          ?A        // hebraisk
     r) a (L06     A         // trappe
     r) a (CL04    A         // generation
  vibr) a (to      'A        // stressed
     r) afae       Af&'e     // Rafael
     r) a (ting    Ej        //
     r) a (d       A         // rad, radmager
     r) adar       AdAr      //
     r) azzia (+   AdS&      // razzia
  L01r) a          A         // grad, gral
     r) a (l       A         // cerebral, bralre, general, ralle
 kamer) a          A         //
 _hurr) a          'A        // stressed
        a (dvar    &         // terroradvarsel
        a (nst     &         // overanstrengt
        a (nvend+  &         // bruseranvendelse
 _madr) a (s       'A        // stressed
    cr) a (ck+     &         //
 efter) a (b       &         // efterabe
   for) a (n       &         // foran
   for) a (nd      A         // forandre
   for) a (nk      A         // forankre
     r) a (nch+    &         //
    br) an (ch     AN        // branche
     d) and (ere   ANd       // dendere
     r) a (nsigt   &         // pokeransigt

// a followed by t + a or o: &:
     d) a (ta      &:        // data TEST
     d) a (to      &:        // dato TEST

// general rule: [&] after m/n before L02 followed by e
   L09) a (L02e+   &         // mave
   can) averal     '&v3r3l   // Cape Canaveral
    gn) av (pot    Aw        // gnavpotte
  torn) ado        '&d?o     // stressed
     n) a (p       A         //
   kan) ape        &p'e      // kanape
   kan) apé        &p'e      // kanapé
     n) a (palm    &         //
     d) a (vid     &         // name
     n) apier      ?Ejp?i?V  // name

// General rule &: followed by -tus
        a (tus     &:        // status TEST

// General rule a between L02: [A]
   L02) a (L02+    ?A        // mappe, pap - too broad?
    _p) a (m_+     ?&        // Pam - name
   L02) a (be+     ?&        // hvabehar - too broad?
    _b) abe (_     ?Ejp      // Babe Ruth
     f) a (brL04+  ?&        // fabrik
   L02) a (ble     &         // vable
  prim) a          ?&        // primaballerina
_reprim) and (e    '?&nd
   L02) a (L02ser  ?A        // babser
     m) amelu (k   ?Am@-l'?u //
     p) apegøje    ?Ab@-g'?Vj@- //
     p) a (v++     &         // pave, pavillon
    sv) a (b       &         // svabre

    sn) a (vs      ?A        //
     m) a (jo+     ?&        // major, majonæse

// general rule: [a] after l before n
     l) a (nd      ?&        // land, lande, landlig - short &
     l) an (cer    ?AN       // lancere
    pl) an (ch     ?AN       // planche
   cas) ablan (ca  ?&bl'?AN  // Casablanca
   atl) a (ntis    '?&       // stressed

// general rule: [A] after consonant before m
     C) a (m+      ?A        // ham, gamle, lam, Sam, samarbejde
     s) a (mL04+   ?&        // Samoa, Samuel
   met) a (+       ?&        // metamorfose
 incit) a          ?&        // incitament
   _im) a (m       '?&       // stressed
     s) amurai     ?&m?ur'aI // samurai
     c) a (mp+     ?&        // camping
        a (mulet   ?A        //
     C) a (mæ+     ?&        // kamæleon TEST
     C) a (mø+     ?&        // famøs TEST
     g) ama (ch    ?&m'?&    // gamacher
   pan) a (ma      ?&        //
  _dyn) a (mo      '&        // stressed
   inf) a (m       '?&       // stressed
     h) a (mburger ?&        // junkfood
     s) a (mant    ?&        // Samantha
        a (ms      ?A        // PN Amsterdam
   pyj) a (ma      '&        // pyjamas
     c) amaro      ?&m'?Er?o // Camaro (car)
   lig) a          ?&        // ligamester
        a (mn      ?A        // amning

// general rule: [&] after l before m + vowel
     l) a (mA+     ?&        // lama, reklame
 _rekl) a (me      '?&       // stressed

// general rule: consonant + a + labial + front vowel
     C) a (mi+     ?&        // vitamin, dynamit, kamin, familie
  gest) a (po      '?A       //
   kad) av (er     '?Aw      // stressed
     r) a (L02L04+ ?A        // bravo
     f) a (vo+     ?&        // favorit
 willi) a (m       ?A        // name
  alab) a (m       '&        // Alabama
        a (mf      ?A        // amfetamin, amfora

// general rule: [&] after f before m/n
     f) a (L09     &         // familie, fane
     f) a (nd      ?&        // fandens
     f) a (mle+    A         //
